Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 22 The I-195 Redevelopment Act of 2002 [Repealed.]

37-22-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-13.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.

37-22-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 427, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 245, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 267, § 5, effective July 9, 2011.